Illinois, session 104th, HB1156.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pesticide Act is amended by adding 5Section 13.6 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 60/13.6 new)7    Sec. 13.6. Seeds treated with a pesticide; ethanol. 8Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person shall 9produce ethanol using seeds that have been treated with a 10pesticide.